District of Columbia statutes.
3-1251.05

Committee powers and duties.

In addition to the powers and duties set forth elsewhere in this chapter, the Committee shall:

(1)

Evaluate a nurse who requests participation in the Program according to the guidelines prescribed by the Committee and consider recommendations for a nurse’s admission into the Program;

(2)

Designate and review facilities and providers to which nurses in the Program may be referred for treatment and services;

(3)

Receive and review information concerning a nurse participating in the Program;

(4)

Consider whether a nurse participating in the Program may safely continue or resume the practice of nursing;

(5)

Hold meetings, as necessary, to consider the requests of nurses to participate in the Program and the reports regarding nurses participating in the Program;

(6)

Establish rules and guidelines for the operation of the Program, including the evaluation of facilities and providers that provide treatment and services to nurses eligible to participate in the program;

(7)

Prepare reports to be submitted to the Board; and

(8)

Set forth in writing a rehabilitation program established for each nurse participating in the Program, including the requirements for supervision and surveillance.

History

May 1, 2001, D.C. Law 13-297, § 6, 48 DCR 2036